test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-pahkekin_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - pahkêkinw - ok : # -m inanimate noun, leather
     pahkêkin+N+IN+Sg: pahkêkin
     pahkêkin+N+IN+Sg+Px1Sg: nipahkêkin
     pahkêkin+N+IN+Sg+Px2Sg: kipahkêkin
     pahkêkin+N+IN+Sg+Px1Pl: nipahkêkinonân
     pahkêkin+N+IN+Sg+Px12Pl: kipahkêkinonaw
     pahkêkin+N+IN+Sg+Px2Pl: kipahkêkinowâw
     pahkêkin+N+IN+Sg+Px3Sg: opahkêkin
     pahkêkin+N+IN+Sg+Px3Pl: opahkêkinowâw
     pahkêkin+N+IN+Sg+Px4Pl: opahkêkinoyiw
     
     pahkêkin+N+IN+Pl: pahkêkinwa
     pahkêkin+N+IN+Pl+Px1Sg: nipahkêkinwa
     pahkêkin+N+IN+Pl+Px2Sg: kipahkêkinwa
     pahkêkin+N+IN+Pl+Px1Pl: nipahkêkinonâna
     pahkêkin+N+IN+Pl+Px12Pl: kipahkêkinonawa
     pahkêkin+N+IN+Pl+Px2Pl: kipahkêkinowâwa
     pahkêkin+N+IN+Pl+Px3Sg: opahkêkinwa
     pahkêkin+N+IN+Pl+Px3Pl: opahkêkinowâwa
     pahkêkin+N+IN+Pl+Px4Pl: opahkêkinoyiwa
     
     pahkêkin+N+IN+Loc: pahkêkinohk
     pahkêkin+N+IN+Px1Sg+Loc: nipahkêkinohk
     pahkêkin+N+IN+Px2Sg+Loc: kipahkêkinohk
     pahkêkin+N+IN+Px1Pl+Loc: nipahkêkinonâhk
     pahkêkin+N+IN+Px12Pl+Loc: kipahkêkinonâhk
     pahkêkin+N+IN+Px2Pl+Loc: kipahkêkinowâhk
     pahkêkin+N+IN+Px3Sg+Loc: opahkêkinohk
     pahkêkin+N+IN+Px3Pl+Loc: opahkêkinowâhk
     pahkêkin+N+IN+Px4Pl+Loc: opahkêkinoyihk
     
     pahkêkin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg: [pahkêkinos, pahkêkinosis]
     pahkêkin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl: [pahkêkinosa, pahkêkinosisa]
     pahkêkin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Loc: [pahkêkinosihk, pahkêkinosisihk]
     pahkêkin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px1Sg: [nipahkêkinos, nipahkêkinosis]
     pahkêkin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px2Sg: [kipahkêkinos, kipahkêkinosis]
     pahkêkin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px3Sg: [opahkêkinos, opahkêkinosis]
     pahkêkin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px4Sg: [opahkêkinosiyiw, opahkêkinosisiyiw]
